Washington statutes.
RCW 39.116.040

Publicly accessible database—Department duties.

(1) The department must continue to develop, maintain, and refine the publicly accessible database funded by the 2021-2023 omnibus operating appropriations act and created by the department in conjunction with the University of Washington college of built environments for selected firms for contracts for covered projects to submit the data required in RCW 39.116.020 to the department and to promote transparency. The department may consult with the University of Washington college of built environments.

(2) The database maintained pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must publish global warming potential as reported in the environmental product declarations.

(3) By July 1, 2025, the department must:

(a) Further elaborate covered product definitions using applicable material industry standards;

(b) Develop measurement and reporting standards to ensure that data is consistent and comparable, including standards for reporting product quantities;

(c) Create model language for specifications, bid documents, and contracts to support the implementation of RCW 39.116.020; and

(d) Produce an educational brief that:

(i) Provides an overview of embodied carbon;

(ii) Describes the appropriate use of environmental product declarations, including the necessary preconditions for environmental product declarations to be comparable;

(iii) Outlines reporting standards, including covered product definitions, standards for reporting product quantities, and working conditions;

(iv) Describes the data collection and reporting process for all information required in RCW 39.116.020 (1)(a) and (3)(a);

(v) Provides instructions for the use of the database; and

(vi) Lists applicable product category rules for covered products.

(4) The department may contract for the use of nationally or internationally recognized databases of environmental product declarations for purposes of implementing this section.

[ 2024 c 344 s 5.]